Oklahoma, session 2025, SB245.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3-180 of Title 70, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
ENGR. H. A. to ENGR. S. B. NO. 245 Page 1

A. The State Department of Education shall establish and
maintain the Oklahoma High Dosage Tutoring Program for grades
kindergarten through eight.
B. For the purposes of this section:
1. “Cohort” means a student or group of students of no more
than five who receive subject-specific high dosage tutoring in
mathematics or English language arts (ELA) and are at least one-half
grade level behind in mathematics or ELA prior to participating in
the Oklahoma High Dosage Tutoring Program; and
2. “High dosage tutoring” means in-person, subject-specific
tutoring conducted by an individual employed by or contracted with a
school district participating in the Oklahoma High Dosage Tutoring
Program after school hours for a minimum of three one-hour sessions
per week per cohort. Tutoring shall be conducted during a minimum
of ten (10) weeks in the fall semester and a minimum of twelve (12)
weeks in the spring semester.
C. 1. Participating school districts shall assess kindergarten
through third grade students participating in high dosage ELA
tutoring using the screening instrument required by Section
1210.508C of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes to track ELA academic
growth. Fourth- through eighth-grade students participating in high
dosage ELA tutoring shall be assessed using an assessment chosen by
the district to determine academic readiness for the next grade
level.
ENGR. H. A. to ENGR. S. B. NO. 245 Page 2

2. Participating school districts shall assess students
participating in high dosage mathematics tutoring using an
assessment chosen by the district to determine academic readiness
for the next grade level.
3. Results of screening instruments and assessments
administered pursuant to this subsection shall be electronically
reported to the State Department of Education three times a year at
intervals determined by the Department.
D. The State Department of Education shall give priority for
participation in the Oklahoma High Dosage Tutoring Program to school
districts federally designated for additional targeted support and
improvement or comprehensive support and improvement under the
Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965 as reauthorized by
P.L. No. 114-95, also known as the Every Student Succeeds Act.
Participation in the program shall be approved on a first-come,
first-served basis without any limitation other than the amount of
funds available for the program and the number of school districts
that apply.
E. High dosage tutors employed by or contracted with public
school districts participating in the Oklahoma High Dosage Tutoring
Program shall be awarded bonuses in the following amounts:
1. One Thousand Six Hundred Dollars ($1,600.00) for each cohort
educated by a high dosage tutor per semester; and

ENGR. H. A. to ENGR. S. B. NO. 245 Page 3

2. One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) for each academic grade
level increase in ELA or mathematics that each student within a
cohort experiences within one (1) academic year.
F. 1. If the students in a high dosage tutor’s cohort do not
improve by at least half a grade level in their tutored subject
within the first year of the program, the tutor shall be placed on a
conditional one-year term of participation.
2. If the students in a high dosage tutor’s cohort fail to
achieve half a grade level of growth during the one-year conditional
term of participation, the tutor shall lose eligibility to
participate in the program. A tutor who loses eligibility pursuant
to this paragraph may be reconsidered as a high dosage tutor after
two (2) years.
3. If the students in a high dosage tutor’s cohort achieve half
a grade level of growth during the one-year conditional term of
participation, the tutor’s conditional status shall be lifted.
G. High dosage tutors shall be provided the necessary
information for each student’s subject-specific academic performance
level, as determined by the student’s current teacher of the tutored
subject.
H. 1. School districts participating in the Oklahoma High
Dosage Tutoring Program shall obtain written consent from a
student’s parent or legal guardian prior to allowing the student to
participate in high dosage tutoring.
ENGR. H. A. to ENGR. S. B. NO. 245 Page 4

2. If a student participating in high dosage tutoring fails to
attend a tutoring session, the tutor shall notify the student’s
school district, and the school district shall notify the student’s
parent or legal guardian.
3. If the parent or legal guardian of a student participating
in high dosage tutoring no longer wishes for the student to
participate, a student fails to attend nine (9) high dosage tutoring
sessions during a semester, or a student’s behavior during tutoring
sessions requires disciplinary action, the student may be removed
from the cohort. The performance of a student subject to the
provisions of this paragraph shall not count against the high dosage
tutor.
I. The State Board of Education shall promulgate rules to
implement the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 6-190, as
last amended by Section 1, Chapter 122, O.S.L. 2024 (70 O.S. Supp.
2024, Section 6-190), is amended to read as follows:
Section 6-190. A. The board of education of each school
district shall employ and contract in writing, as required in
Section 6-101 of this title, only with persons certified to teach by
the State Board of Education in accordance with the Oklahoma Teacher
Preparation Act, except as otherwise provided for by Section 6-101
of this title and by other law.

ENGR. H. A. to ENGR. S. B. NO. 245 Page 5

B. The Board shall issue a certificate to teach to any person
who:
1. Has successfully completed the teacher education program
required by the Commission for Educational Quality and
Accountability;
2. Has graduated from an accredited institution of higher
education that has approval or accreditation for teacher education;
3. Has met all other requirements as may be established by the
Board;
4. Has made the necessary application and paid the competency
examination fee in an amount and as prescribed by the Commission;
5. Has successfully completed the competency examination
required in Section 6-187 of this title; and
6. Beginning November 1, 2001, has on file with the Board a
current Oklahoma criminal history record from the Oklahoma State
Bureau of Investigation as well as a national criminal history
record check as defined in Section 150.9 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma
Statutes. Upon receipt of the Oklahoma criminal history record, the
Board may issue a temporary certificate which shall be effective
until receipt of the national fingerprint-based criminal history
record. The person applying for a certificate shall be responsible
for the cost of the criminal history records.
C. The Board shall issue a certificate to teach to any person
who:
ENGR. H. A. to ENGR. S. B. NO. 245 Page 6

1. Holds an out-of-state certificate and meets the requirements
set forth in subsection G of this section;
2. Holds certification from the National Board for Professional
Teaching Standards;
3. Holds an out-of-country certificate and meets the
requirements set forth in subsection F of this section; or
4. Has successfully completed a competency examination used in
the majority of other states or comparable customized exam and meets
the requirements set forth in subsection H of this section.
D. Beginning July 1, 2004, any person applying for initial
Oklahoma certification shall have on file with the Board a current
Oklahoma criminal history record from the Oklahoma State Bureau of
Investigation as well as a national criminal history record check as
defined in Section 150.9 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes. Upon
receipt of the Oklahoma criminal history record, the Board may issue
a temporary certificate which shall be effective until receipt of
the national fingerprint-based criminal history record. The person
applying for a certificate shall be responsible for the cost of the
criminal history records.
E. Any person holding a valid certificate, issued prior to
January 1, 1997, shall be a certified teacher for purposes of the
Oklahoma Teacher Preparation Act, subject to any professional
development requirements prescribed by the Oklahoma Teacher
Preparation Act or by the State Board of Education.
ENGR. H. A. to ENGR. S. B. NO. 245 Page 7

F. 1. The Board shall issue a certificate to teach to a person
who holds a valid out-of-country certificate and meets any
requirements established by the Board. The certificate to teach
shall only be for those subject areas and grade levels most closely
aligned to the subject areas and grade levels recognized on the out-
of-country certificate.
2. A person who meets the requirements of paragraph 1 of this
subsection shall not be required to take any competency examinations
in those subject areas and grade levels most closely aligned to the
subject areas and grade levels recognized on the out-of-country
certificate.
3. A person who meets the requirements of paragraph 1 of this
subsection shall have on file with the Board a current Oklahoma
criminal history record check from the Oklahoma State Bureau of
Investigation as well as a national criminal history record check as
defined in Section 150.9 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes. Upon
receipt of the Oklahoma criminal history record check, the Board may
issue a temporary certificate which shall be effective until receipt
of the national fingerprint-based criminal history record check.
The person applying for a certificate shall be responsible for the
cost of the criminal history record checks.
4. The Board shall promulgate rules establishing a process by
which out-of-country certificates will be reviewed and evaluated for

ENGR. H. A. to ENGR. S. B. NO. 245 Page 8

purp oses of awarding a certificate to teach pursuant to this
subsection.
G. 1. The Board shall issue a certificate to teach to a person
who holds a valid out-of-state certificate. The certificate to
teach shall only be for those subject areas and grade levels most
closely aligned to the subject areas and grade levels recognized on
the out-of-state certificate.
2. A person who meets the requirements of paragraph 1 of this
subsection shall not be required to take any competency examinations
in those subject areas and grade levels most closely aligned to the
subject areas and grade levels recognized on the out-of-state
certificate.
3. A person who meets the requirements of this subsection shall
have on file with the Board a current Oklahoma criminal history
record check from the Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation as well
as a national criminal history record check as defined in Section
150.9 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes. Upon receipt of the
Oklahoma criminal history record check, the Board may issue a
temporary certificate which shall be effective until receipt of the
national fingerprint-based criminal history record check. The
person applying for a certificate shall be responsible for the cost
of the criminal history record checks.
H. 1. The Board shall issue a certificate to teach to a person
who has successfully completed a competency exam used in a majority
ENGR. H. A. to ENGR. S. B. NO. 245 Page 9

of t he other states. The certificate to teach shall only be for
those subject areas and grade levels that correspond with a
certification area used in Oklahoma.
2. A person who meets the requirements of paragraph 1 of this
subsection shall have on file with the Board a current Oklahoma
criminal history record check from the Oklahoma State Bureau of
Investigation as well as a national criminal history record check as
defined in Section 150.9 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes. Upon
receipt of the Oklahoma criminal history record check, the Board may
issue a temporary certificate which shall be effective until receipt
of the national fingerprint-based criminal history record check.
The person applying for a certificate shall be responsible for the
cost of the criminal history record checks.
I. 1. The Board may establish new levels of teacher
certificates: advanced, lead, and master. Each level shall have a
salary increase requirement stipend paid with state dollars from the
lottery funds as provided in Section 713 of Title 3A of the Oklahoma
Statutes. The advanced certificate shall include a salary increase
stipend of Three Thousand Dollars ($3,000.00), the lead certificate
shall include a salary increase stipend of Five Thousand Dollars
($5,000.00), and the master certificate shall include a salary
increase stipend of Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00).
2. A teacher who works in a school with an enrollment of forty
percent (40%) or more of students who are economically disadvantaged
ENGR. H. A. to ENGR. S. B. NO. 245 Page 10

as d efined in Section 18-109.5 of this title or a school district
with an enrollment of fewer than one thousand students shall be paid
a one-time award in addition to the salary increases stipends
provided in paragraph 1 of this subsection:
a. One Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($1,500.00) for an
advanced certificate,
b. Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) for a
lead certificate, and
c. Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) for a master
certificate.
3. School districts may identify and designate the highest
quality teachers for advanced, lead, and master certificates.
Participating districts shall submit designation plans to the State
Department of Education for evaluation and approval. Districts
shall have local control and flexibility in determining how to
evaluate teachers and assign designations, but, at a minimum, the
designation system shall include a teacher observation, out-of-
classroom time, and a student performance component.
a. Teacher observation shall be based on the district’s
selected Oklahoma Teacher and Leader Effectiveness
Evaluation System (TLE) evaluation tool or an
alternate method of evaluation; provided, the method
is evidenced-based evidence-based. Alternate methods

ENGR. H. A. to ENGR. S. B. NO. 245 Page 11

of evaluation shall not replace the requirements of
Section 6-101.16 of this title.
b. Each school district that elects to participate in
assigning advanced, lead, and master teacher
certificates shall include an out-of-classroom
component for its assigned teachers to allow for
professional growth opportunities while staying in the
classroom. How out-of-classroom time is allotted and
managed shall be determined by the school district and
submitted as part of its designation plan to the State
Department of Education for review and approval.
c. Student performance measures may be determined by the
district and may include, but shall not be limited to,
pre- and post-tests, summative or formative, and
portfolios. The school district application shall
show evidence of validity and reliability of the
measures.
d. No more than ten percent (10%) of each school
district’s teachers may be designated as an advanced,
lead, or master teacher in any given school year.
Districts which receive Title I funds within the top
quartile of individual student allotment amounts may
designate an additional ten percent (10%) of teachers

ENGR. H. A. to ENGR. S. B. NO. 245 Page 12

employed at school sites which receive the Title I
funding as advanced, lead, or master.
Districts may use additional factors in determining which
teachers are eligible to receive a designation, such as student
surveys, teacher leadership responsibilities, teacher mentorship
responsibilities, family surveys, demonstration of district core
values, teacher peer surveys, and contributions to the broader
school community. No more than ten percent (10%) of each school
district’s teachers may be designated as an advanced, lead, or
master teacher in any given school year.
4. If a school district chooses to participate in this program,
the state shall provide the increased salary stipend amounts
indicated for advanced, lead, and master certificates in paragraph 1
of this subsection above the base pay.
5. School districts that designate teachers for advanced, lead,
and master certificates do not have to participate in annual TLE
evaluations for the designated teachers.
6. School districts may designate teachers for advanced, lead,
or master certificates two times per year, once prior to the
beginning of the school year, and once prior to the beginning of the
second semester. Teachers statewide who receive these designations
shall be placed in professional development cohorts and provided
additional training opportunities from the State Department of
Education.
ENGR. H. A. to ENGR. S. B. NO. 245 Page 13

7. After initial approval by the State Department of Education,
the Department shall review and validate each participating school
district’s teacher evaluation system biennially.
8. The State Department of Education shall annually report the
school districts participating in the program, the number of
advanced, lead, and master certificates awarded, and the total
amount in state funding that was distributed to teachers from the
Teacher Empowerment Revolving Fund created in Section 6-190.2 of
this title.
9. The selection criteria; designation of advanced, lead, or
master teachers; and any associated salary increases stipend amounts
shall not be subject to collective bargaining.
10. Stipends provided pursuant to this subsection shall not be
included in the calculation of the teacher’s salary for purposes of
meeting the district or statutory minimum salary schedule or for
purposes of calculating Teachers’ Retirement System of Oklahoma
contributions or benefits.
J. The State Board of Education shall adopt rules to implement
a renewal schedule and associated fees for advanced, lead, and
master teaching certificates. The rules shall allow a teacher that
no longer meets the requirements of an advanced, lead, or master
teaching certificate to make application for the standard teaching
certificate.

ENGR. H. A. to ENGR. S. B. NO. 245 Page 14

K. The terms of the contracts issued to those holding advanced,
lead, and master teaching certificates shall include the following:
1. Advanced: an additional five (5) days to be used to
strengthen instructional leadership. A person with an advanced
teaching certificate shall receive an annual salary increase stipend
of Three Thousand Dollars ($3,000.00) or the district’s daily rate
of pay, whichever is higher, in addition to the salary for which the
teacher qualifies pursuant to Section 18-114.15 of this title. This
increase stipend shall be funded by state dollars from the lottery
funds as provided in Section 713 of Title 3A of the Oklahoma
Statutes and shall be paid as regular annual compensation directly
to teachers through school districts;
2. Lead: an additional ten (10) days to be used to strengthen
instructional leadership. A person with a lead teaching certificate
shall receive an annual salary increase stipend of Five Thousand
Dollars ($5,000.00) or the district’s daily rate of pay, whichever
is higher, in addition to the salary for which the teacher qualifies
pursuant to Section 18-114.15 of this title. This increase stipend
shall be funded by state dollars from the lottery funds as provided
in Section 713 of Title 3A of the Oklahoma Statutes and shall be
paid as regular annual compensation directly to teachers through
school districts; and
3. Master: an additional fifteen (15) days to be used to
strengthen leadership. A person with a master teaching certificate
ENGR. H. A. to ENGR. S. B. NO. 245 Page 15

shal l receive an annual salary increase stipend of Ten Thousand
Dollars ($10,000.00) or the district’s daily rate of pay, whichever
is higher, in addition to the salary for which the teacher qualifies
pursuant to Section 18-114.15 of this title. This increase stipend
shall be funded by state dollars from the lottery funds as provided
in Section 713 of Title 3A of the Oklahoma Statutes and shall be
paid as regular annual compensation directly to teachers through
school districts.
If a person with an advanced, lead, or master teaching
certificate changes school districts during the life of the
certificate, the terms of the contracts required in this subsection
shall be subject to approval by the new employing school district.
L. Beginning in the 2022-2023 school year, the Department shall
make the teaching certificates provided for in this section
available for any person who has received a recommendation from his
or her school district and who meets the eligibility criteria as
outlined in each school district’s teacher evaluation system
provided for in subsection I of this section.
M. The funding necessary for the administration of this section
shall be provided from the Teacher Empowerment Revolving Fund
created in Section 6-190.2 of this title. If funding for the
administration of the teaching certificates listed in subsection I
is not available, the Department shall not be required to fulfill
the requirements listed in subsections I, K, and L of this section.
ENGR. H. A. to ENGR. S. B. NO. 245 Page 16

N. The State Board of Education shall promulgate rules to
implement the provisions of Section 6-180 et seq. of this title.
SECTION 3. AMENDATORY Section 2, Chapter 359, O.S.L.
2022, as amended by Section 2, Chapter 122, O.S.L. 2024 (70 O.S.
Supp. 2024, Section 6-190.2), is amended to read as follows:
Section 6-190.2. A. There is hereby created in the State
Treasury a revolving fund for the State Department of Education to
be designated the “Teacher Empowerment Revolving Fund”. The
revolving fund shall be a continuing fund, without legislative
appropriation, not subject to fiscal year limitations, and shall be
under the control and management of the State Department of
Education. Expenditures from the Teacher Empowerment Revolving Fund
shall be budgeted and expended as provided for in subsection B of
this section.
B. The State Department of Education shall utilize the funds
for the program outlined in Section 6-190 of this title. Funding
shall be allocated to school districts to provide the increased
salary stipend amounts indicated for advanced, lead, and master
certificates as provided for in subsection I of Section 6-190 of
this title on a first-come, first-served basis until the cash is
exhausted for the school year.
SECTION 4. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 5. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby
ENGR. H. A. to ENGR. S. B. NO. 245 Page 17

decl ared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval."
Passed the House of Representatives the 29th day of April, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the House of
Representatives

Passed the Senate the ____ day of __________, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the Senate













ENGR. H. A. to ENGR. S. B. NO. 245 Page 18

ENGR OSSED SENATE
BILL NO. 245 By: Deevers of the Senate

and

Hasenbeck of the House


[ State Department of Education – High Dosage
Tutoring Program - eligibility - promulgation of
rules – revolving fund - codification - effective
date -
emergency ]


BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 6. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3-180 of Title 70, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The State Department of Education shall establish and
maintain the Oklahoma High Dosage Tutoring Program for grades
kindergarten through eight.
B. For the purposes of this section:
1. “Cohort” means a student or group of students of no more
than five who receive subject-specific high dosage tutoring in
mathematics or English language arts (ELA) and are at least one-half
grade level behind in mathematics or ELA prior to participating in
the Oklahoma High Dosage Tutoring Program; and

ENGR. S. B. NO. 245 Page 1

2. “High dosage tutoring” means in-person, subject-specific
tutoring conducted by an individual employed by or contracted with a
school district participating in the Oklahoma High Dosage Tutoring
Program after school hours for a minimum of three one-hour sessions
per week per cohort. Tutoring shall be conducted during a minimum
of ten (10) weeks in the fall semester and a minimum of twelve (12)
weeks in the spring semester.
C. 1. Participating school districts shall assess kindergarten
through third grade students participating in high dosage ELA
tutoring using the screening instrument required by Section
1210.508C of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes to track ELA academic
growth. Fourth- through eighth-grade students participating in high
dosage ELA tutoring shall be assessed using an assessment chosen by
the district to determine academic readiness for the next grade
level.
2. Participating school districts shall assess students
participating in high dosage mathematics tutoring using an
assessment chosen by the district to determine academic readiness
for the next grade level.
3. Results of screening instruments and assessments
administered pursuant to this subsection shall be electronically
reported to the State Department of Education three times a year at
intervals determined by the Department.

ENGR. S. B. NO. 245 Page 2

D. The State Department of Education shall give priority for
participation in the Oklahoma High Dosage Tutoring Program to school
districts federally designated for additional targeted support and
improvement or comprehensive support and improvement under the
Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965 as reauthorized by
P.L. No. 114-95, also known as the Every Student Succeeds Act.
Participation in the program shall be approved on a first-come,
first-served basis without any limitation other than the amount of
funds available for the program and the number of school districts
that apply.
E. High dosage tutors employed by or contracted with public
school districts participating in the Oklahoma High Dosage Tutoring
Program shall be awarded bonuses in the following amounts:
1. One Thousand Six Hundred Dollars ($1,600.00) for each cohort
educated by a high dosage tutor per semester; and
2. One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) for each academic grade
level increase in ELA or mathematics that each student within a
cohort experiences within one academic year.
F. 1. If the students in a high dosage tutor’s cohort do not
improve by at least half a grade level in their tutored subject
within the first year of the program, the tutor shall be placed on a
conditional one-year term of participation.
2. If the students in a high dosage tutor’s cohort fail to
achieve half a grade level of growth during the one-year conditional
ENGR. S. B. NO. 245 Page 3

term of participation, he or she shall lose eligibility to
participate in the program. A tutor who loses eligibility pursuant
to this paragraph may be reconsidered as a high dosage tutor after
two years.
3. If the students in a high dosage tutor’s cohort achieve half
a grade level of growth during the one-year conditional term of
participation, the tutor’s conditional status shall be lifted.
G. High dosage tutors shall be provided the necessary
information for each student’s subject-specific academic performance
level, as determined by the student’s current teacher of the tutored
subject.
H. 1. School districts participating in the Oklahoma High
Dosage Tutoring Program shall obtain written consent from a
student’s parent or legal guardian prior to allowing the student to
participate in high dosage tutoring.
2. If a student participating in high dosage tutoring fails to
attend a tutoring session, the tutor shall notify the student’s
school district, and the school district shall notify the student’s
parent or legal guardian.
3. If the parent or legal guardian of a student participating
in high dosage tutoring no longer wishes for the student to
participate, a student fails to attend nine high dosage tutoring
sessions during a semester, or a student’s behavior during tutoring
sessions requires disciplinary action, the student may be removed
ENGR. S. B. NO. 245 Page 4

from the cohort. The performance of a student subject to the
provisions of this paragraph shall not count against the high dosage
tutor.
I. The State Board of Education shall promulgate rules to
implement the provisions of this section.
SECTION 7. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3-180.1 of Title 70, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving fund
for the State Department of Education to be designated the “High
Dosage Tutoring Revolving Fund”. The fund shall be a continuing
fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations, and shall consist of
all monies received by the State Department of Education from gifts,
grants, donations, bequests, federal funds provided for the purpose
of funding high dosage tutoring, or state appropriations provided
for the purpose of implementing the provisions of Section 1 of this
act. All monies accruing to the credit of the fund are hereby
appropriated and may be budgeted and expended by the State
Department of Education for the purpose provided for in this
section. Expenditures from the fund shall be made upon warrants
issued by the State Treasurer against claims filed as prescribed by
law with the Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise
Services for approval and payment.
SECTION 8. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
ENGR. S. B. NO. 245 Page 5

SECTION 9. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
Passed the Senate the 26th day of March, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the Senate

Passed the House of Representatives the ____ day of __________,
2025.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives











ENGR. S. B. NO. 245 Page 6